Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 5. Fraud And Liabilities

§ 17-4-501.
General
fraud.

It is unlawful for a person, in connection with the offer, sale, or purchase of a security, directly or indirectly:

To employ a device, scheme, or artifice to defraud;

To make an untrue statement of a material fact or to omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements made, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; or

To engage in an act, practice, or course of business that operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit upon another person.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Personal jurisdiction. —

Fraud case
against several rating agencies was dismissed because whether the
agencies knew that investors in Wyoming would rely on their credit
ratings did not alone form the basis for exercising personal jurisdiction
over them; the State failed to make a prima facie showing that Wyoming
was the focal point or that the agencies expressly aimed their tortious
conduct at Wyoming. Moreover, an allegation of a violation of the
Wyoming Uniform Securities Act did not supersede the due process requirements
of the United States Constitution. State v. Moody's Investors Serv., 2015 WY 66, 349 P.3d 979,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2015).

Exempted trust companies were not exempted from anti-fraud provision of this section

and the civil liabilities imposed by § 17-4-122 prior to 1975. Gaudina v. Haberman, 644 P.2d 159,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 329

(Wyo. 1982).

Investors failed to present evidence of common law fraud. —

Investors' claims for common law fraud under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

17-4-101

and fraud under 15 U.S.C.S. § 78r, were dismissed because the investors failed to show that they relied upon defendants' statements to their detriment because they actively opposed the reverse stock split and they purchased their shares at an amount significantly less than the actual value of the stock. Ravenswood Inv. Co., L.P. v. Bishop Capital Corp., 374 F. Supp. 2d 1055, 2005 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12932 (D. Wyo. 2005).

Cited

in

Dickson v. State, 903 P.2d
1019,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 1995).

Law reviews. —

For article, “An Overview of Wyoming Securities Law,” see 2 Wyo. L. Rev. 345 (2002).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Who is “forced seller” for purposes of maintenance of civil action under § 10(b) of Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 USC § 78j(b) and SEC Rule 10b-5, 59 ALR Fed 10.

Defense of ignorance of untruth or omission in civil action under § 12(2) of Securities Act of 1933 (15 U.S.C. § 77

l

(2) (now 15 U.S.C. § 77

l

(a)(22), 109 ALR Fed 444.

Scienter requirement in actions under antifraud provision of Investment Advisers Act (15 USCS § 80b-6), 133 ALR Fed 549.

Assertion of double jeopardy defense based on sanction sought or imposed during civil or administrative proceeding initiated by Securities and Exchange Commission or National Securities Organization or Exchange,147 ALR Fed 585.

What constitutes “inquiry notice” sufficient to commence running of statute of limitations in securities fraud action — Post-Lampf cases, 148 ALR Fed 629.

Effect of asset freeze obtained by Securities and Exchange Commission on attorney's fees paid or owed by company subject to freeze, 161 ALR Fed 233.

§ 17-4-502.
Prohibited
conduct in providing investment advice.

It is unlawful for a person that advises others for compensation, either directly or indirectly or through publications or writings, as to the value of securities or the advisability of investing in, purchasing, or selling securities or that, for compensation and as part of a regular business, issues or promulgates analyses or reports relating to securities:

To employ a device, scheme, or artifice to defraud another person; or

To engage in an act, practice, or course of business that operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit upon another person.

A rule adopted under this act may define an act, practice, or course of business of an investment adviser or an investment adviser representative, other than a supervised person of a federal covered investment adviser, as fraudulent, deceptive, or manipulative, and prescribe means reasonably designed to prevent investment advisers and investment adviser representatives, other than supervised persons of a federal covered investment adviser, from engaging in acts, practices, and courses of business defined as fraudulent, deceptive, or manipulative.

A rule adopted under this act may specify the contents of an investment advisory contract entered into, extended, or renewed by an investment adviser.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Scienter requirement in actions under antifraud provision of Investment Advisers Act (15 USCS § 80b-6), 133 ALR Fed 549.

§ 17-4-503.
Evidentiary
burden.

In a civil action or administrative proceeding under this act, a person claiming an exemption, exception, preemption, or exclusion has the burden to prove the applicability of the claim.

In a criminal proceeding under this act, a person claiming an exemption, exception, preemption, or exclusion has the burden of going forward with evidence of the claim.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 17-4-504.
Filing
of sales and advertising literature.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, a rule adopted or order issued under this act may require the filing of a prospectus, pamphlet, circular, form letter, advertisement, sales literature, or other advertising record relating to a security or investment advice, addressed or intended for distribution to prospective investors, including clients or prospective clients of a person registered or required to be registered as an investment adviser under this act.

This section does not apply to sales and advertising literature specified in subsection (a) of this section which relates to a federal covered security, a federal covered investment adviser, or a security or transaction exempted by W.S.

17-4-201

through

17-4-204

except as required pursuant to W.S.

17-4-201

(a)(vii).

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 17-4-505.
Misleading
filings.

It is unlawful
for a person to make or cause to be made, in a record that is used
in an action or proceeding or filed under this act, a statement that,
at the time and in the light of the circumstances under which it is
made, is false or misleading in a material respect, or, in connection
with the statement, to omit to state a material fact necessary to
make the statement made, in the light of the circumstances under which
it was made, not false or misleading.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 17-4-506.
Misrepresentations
concerning registration or exemption.

The filing of an application for registration, a registration statement, a notice filing under this act, the registration of a person, the notice filing by a person, or the registration of a security under this act does not constitute a finding by the secretary of state that a record filed under this act is true, complete, and not misleading. The filing or registration or the availability of an exemption, exception, preemption, or exclusion for a security or a transaction does not mean that the secretary of state has passed upon the merits or qualifications of, or recommended or given approval to, a person, security, or transaction.

It is unlawful to make, or cause to be made, to a purchaser, customer, client, or prospective customer or client a representation inconsistent with this section.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 17-4-507.
Qualified
immunity.

A broker-dealer,
agent, investment adviser, federal covered investment adviser, or
investment adviser representative is not liable to another broker-dealer,
agent, investment adviser, federal covered investment adviser, or
investment adviser representative for defamation relating to a statement
that is contained in a record required by the secretary of state,
or designee of the secretary of state, the securities and exchange
commission, or a self-regulatory organization, unless the person knew,
or should have known at the time that the statement was made, that
it was false in a material respect or the person acted in reckless
disregard of the statement’s truth or falsity.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 17-4-508.
Criminal
penalties.

A person that willfully violates this act, or a rule adopted or order issued under this act, except W.S.

17-4-504

or the notice filing requirements of W.S.

17-4-302

or

17-4-405

, or that willfully violates W.S.

17-4-505

knowing the statement made to be false or misleading in a material respect, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) or imprisoned not more than three (3) years, or both. An individual convicted of violating a rule or order under this act may be fined, but may not be imprisoned, if the individual did not have knowledge of the rule or order.

The attorney general or district attorney with or without a reference from the secretary of state, may institute criminal proceedings under this act.

This act does not limit the power of this state to punish a person for conduct that constitutes a crime under other laws of this state.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Who is “forced seller” for purposes of maintenance of civil action under § 10(b) of Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 USC § 78j(b)) and SEC Rule 10b-5, 59 ALR Fed 10.

§ 17-4-509.
Civil
Liability.

Enforcement of civil liability under this section is subject to the Securities Litigation Uniform Standards Act of 1998.

A person is liable to the purchaser if the person sells a security in violation of W.S.

17-4-301

or, by means of an untrue statement of a material fact or an omission to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statement made, in light of the circumstances under which it is made, not misleading, the purchaser not knowing the untruth or omission and the seller not sustaining the burden of proof that the seller did not know and, in the exercise of reasonable care, could not have known of the untruth or omission. An action under this subsection is governed by the following:

The purchaser may maintain an action to recover the consideration paid for the security, less the amount of any income received on the security, and interest at six percent (6%) per year from the date of the purchase, costs, and reasonable attorneys” fees determined by the court, upon the tender of the security, or for actual damages as provided in paragraph (iii) of this subsection;

The tender referred to in paragraph (i) of this subsection may be made any time before entry of judgment. Tender requires only notice in a record of ownership of the security and willingness to exchange the security for the amount specified. A purchaser that no longer owns the security may recover actual damages as provided in paragraph (iii) of this subsection;

Actual damages in an action arising under this subsection are the amount that would be recoverable upon a tender less the value of the security when the purchaser disposed of it, and interest at six percent (6%) per year from the date of the purchase, costs and reasonable attorneys” fees determined by the court.

A person is liable to the seller if the person buys a security by means of an untrue statement of a material fact or omission to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statement made, in light of the circumstances under which it is made, not misleading, the seller not knowing of the untruth or omission, and the purchaser not sustaining the burden of proof that the purchaser did not know, and in the exercise of reasonable care, could not have known of the untruth or omission. An action under this subsection is governed by the following:

The seller may maintain an action to recover the security, and any income received on the security, costs, and reasonable attorneys” fees determined by the court, upon the tender of the purchase price, or for actual damages as provided in paragraph (iii) of this subsection;

The tender referred to in paragraph (i) of this subsection may be made any time before entry of judgment. Tender requires only notice in a record of the present ability to pay the amount tendered and willingness to take delivery of the security for the amount specified. If the purchaser no longer owns the security, the seller may recover actual damages as provided in paragraph (iii) of this subsection;

Actual damages in an action arising under this subsection are the difference between the price at which the security was sold and the value the security would have had at the time of the sale in the absence of the purchaser’s conduct causing liability, and interest at six percent (6%) per year from the date of the sale of the security, costs, and reasonable attorneys” fees determined by the court.

A person acting as a broker-dealer or agent that sells or buys a security in violation of W.S. 17-4-401(a), 17-4-402(a), or

17-4-506

is liable to the customer. The customer, if a purchaser, may maintain an action for recovery of actual damages as specified in paragraphs (b)(i) through (iii) of this section, or, if a seller, for a remedy as specified in paragraphs (c)(i) through (iii) of this section.

A person acting as an investment adviser or investment adviser representative that provides investment advice for compensation in violation of W.S. 17-4-403(a), 17-4-404(a), or

17-4-506

is liable to the client. The client may maintain an action to recover the consideration paid for the advice, interest at the rate of six percent (6%) per year from the date of payment, costs, and reasonable attorneys” fees determined by the court.

A person that receives directly or indirectly any consideration for providing investment advice to another person and that employs a device, scheme, or artifice to defraud the other person or engages in an act, practice, or course of business that operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit on the other person, is liable to the other person. An action under this subsection is governed by the following:

The person defrauded may maintain an action to recover the consideration paid for the advice and the amount of any actual damages caused by the fraudulent conduct, interest at six percent (6%) per year from the date of the fraudulent conduct, costs, and reasonable attorneys” fees determined by the court, less the amount of any income received as a result of the fraudulent conduct;

This subsection does not apply to a broker-dealer or its agents if the investment advice provided is solely incidental to transacting business as a broker-dealer and no special compensation is received for the investment advice.

The following persons are liable jointly and severally with and to the same extent as persons liable under subsections (b) through (f) of this section:

A person that directly or indirectly controls a person liable under subsections (b) through (f) of this section, unless the controlling person sustains the burden of proof that the person did not know, and in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known, of the existence of conduct by reason of which the liability is alleged to exist;

An individual who is a managing partner, executive officer, or director of a person liable under subsections (b) through (f) of this section, including an individual having a similar status or performing similar functions, unless the individual sustains the burden of proof that the individual did not know and, in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known, of the existence of conduct by reason of which the liability is alleged to exist;

An individual who is an employee of or associated with a person liable under subsections (b) through (f) of this section and who materially aids the conduct giving rise to the liability, unless the individual sustains the burden of proof that the individual did not know and, in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known, of the existence of conduct by reason of which the liability is alleged to exist; and

A person that is a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative that materially aids the conduct giving rise to the liability under subsections (b) through (f) of this section, unless the person sustains the burden of proof that the person did not know and, in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known, of the existence of conduct by reason of which liability is alleged to exist.

A person liable under this section has a right of contribution as in cases of contract against any other person liable under this section for the same conduct.

A cause of action under this section survives the death of an individual who might have been a plaintiff or defendant.

A person may not obtain relief:

Under subsection (b) of this section for violation of W.S.

17-4-301

, or under subsection (d) or (e) of this section, unless the action is instituted within one (1) year after the violation occurred; or

Under subsection (b) of this section, other than for violation of W.S.

17-4-301

, or under subsection (c) or (f) of this section, unless the action is instituted within the earlier of two (2) years after discovery of the facts constituting the violation or five (5) years after the violation.

A person that has made, or has engaged in the performance of, a contract in violation of this act or a rule adopted or order issued under this act, or that has acquired a purported right under the contract with knowledge of conduct by reason of which its making or performance was in violation of this act, may not base an action on the contract.

A condition, stipulation, or provision binding a person purchasing or selling a security or receiving investment advice to waive compliance with this act or a rule adopted or order issued under this act is void.

The rights and remedies provided by this act are in addition to any other rights or remedies that may exist, but this act does not create a cause of action not specified in this section or W.S. 17-4-411(e).

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Agents charged with knowledge of registration requirements.
—

Recovery under this chapter does not depend upon a showing of a seller's consciousness of the falsity of the material misrepresentations he makes. Agents are charged with knowledge of registration requirements and there is a duty not to assist unlawful sales; civil liability follows as a matter of course. Gaudina v. Haberman, 644 P.2d 159,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 329

(Wyo. 1982).

Exempted trust companies were not exempted from civil liabilities

imposed by this section and §

17-4-101

prior to 1975. Gaudina v. Haberman, 644 P.2d 159,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 329

(Wyo. 1982).

Cited

in

Dickson v. State, 903 P.2d
1019,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 1995).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Securities — Oil and Gas Leases: Should They be Considered Securities? Shepperd v. Boettcher & Co., 613 F. Supp. 287, 1985 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 17830 (D. Wyo. 1985),” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 99 (1986).

For comment, “Civil RICO After Sedima: An Exercise in Restraint,” see XXII Land & Water L. Rev. 153 (1987).

For comments, “Wyoming Tort Reform and the Medical Malpractice Insurance Crisis: A Second Opinion,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 593 (1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of independent accountant to investors or shareholders, 35 ALR4th 225.

Private federal right of action against brokerage firm for violation of exchange or dealer association rule, 54 ALR Fed 11.

Who is “forced seller” for purposes of maintenance of civil action under § 10(b) of Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 USC § 78j(b)) and SEC Rule 10b-5, 59 ALR Fed 10.

Right to contribution among defendants in action under § 10(b) of Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 USC § 78j(b)) or SEC Rule 10b-5, 62 ALR Fed 802.

When does state statute of limitations begin to run in civil action for securities fraud under § 10(b) of Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 USC § 78j(b)), 71 ALR Fed 257.

Availability of implied private right of action against stock exchange under § 6 of Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 USC § 78f), 72 ALR Fed 101.

Applicable state limitations period in actions under § 10(b) of Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 USC § 78j(b)) and SEC Rule 10b-5 (17 CFR § 240.10b-5), 72 ALR Fed 763.

When is it unnecessary to show direct reliance on misrepresentation or omission in civil securities fraud action under § 10(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 USC § 78j(b)) and SEC Rule 10b-5 (17 CFR § 240.10b-5), 93 ALR Fed 444.

Who may be liable in civil action, under § 12(1) of Securities Act of 1933 (15 U.S.C. § 77

l

(1) (now 15 U.S.C. § 77

l

(a)(1)), for selling or offering securities for sale in violation of registration or prospectus provisions of act — post-Pinter cases, 105 ALR Fed 725.

Who may be liable in actions under § 12(2) of Securities Act of 1933 (15 U.S.C. § 77

l

(2) (now 15 U.S.C. § 77

l

(a)(2)), on basis of false or misleading statement in prospectus or oral communication, 106 ALR Fed 753.

Defense of ignorance of untruth or omission in civil action under § 12(2) of Securities Act of 1933 (15 U.S.C. § 77

l

(2) (now 15 U.S.C. § 77

l

(a)(2)), 109 ALR Fed 444.

Conduct creating civil liability, under § 12(2) of Securities Act of 1933 (15 U.S.C. § 77

l

(2) (now 15 U.S.C. § 77

l

(a)(2)), based on misrepresentations in or omissions from prospectus or oral communication regarding sale of security, 112 ALR Fed 387.

Persons entitled to relief under civil liability provisions of § 12 of Securities Act of 1933 (15 U.S.C. § 77

l

), 113 ALR Fed 575.

§ 17-4-510.
Rescission
offers.

A purchaser, seller, or recipient of investment advice may not maintain an action under W.S.

17-4-509

if:

The purchaser, seller, or recipient of investment advice receives in a record, before the action is instituted:

An offer stating the respect in which liability under W.S.

17-4-509

may have arisen and fairly advising the purchaser, seller, or recipient of investment advice of that person’s rights in connection with the offer, and any financial or other information necessary to correct all material misrepresentations or omissions in the information that was required by this act to be furnished to that person at the time of the purchase, sale, or investment advice;

If the basis for relief under this section may have been a violation of W.S. 17-4-509(b), an offer to repurchase the security for cash, payable on delivery of the security, equal to the consideration paid, and interest at six percent (6%) per year from the date of the purchase, less the amount of any income received on the security, or, if the purchaser no longer owns the security, an offer to pay the purchaser upon acceptance of the offer damages in an amount that would be recoverable upon a tender, less the value of the security when the purchaser disposed of it, and interest at six percent (6%) per year from the date of the purchase in cash equal to the damages computed in the manner provided in this subsection;

If the basis for relief under this section may have been a violation of W.S. 17-4-509(c), an offer to tender the security, on payment by the seller of an amount equal to the purchase price paid, less income received on the security by the purchaser and interest at six percent (6%) per year from the date of the sale; or if the purchaser no longer owns the security, an offer to pay the seller upon acceptance of the offer, in cash, damages in the amount of the difference between the price at which the security was purchased and the value the security would have had at the time of the purchase in the absence of the purchaser’s conduct that may have caused liability and interest at six percent (6%) per year from the date of the sale;

If the basis for relief under this section may have been a violation of W.S. 17-4-509(d); and if the customer is a purchaser, an offer to pay as specified in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph; or, if the customer is a seller, an offer to tender or to pay as specified in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph;

If the basis for relief under this section may have been a violation of W.S. 17-4-509(e), an offer to reimburse in cash the consideration paid for the advice and interest at six percent (6%) per year from the date of payment; or

If the basis for relief under this section may have been a violation of W.S. 17-4-509(f), an offer to reimburse in cash the consideration paid for the advice, the amount of any actual damages that may have been caused by the conduct, and interest at six percent (6%) per year from the date of the violation causing the loss.

The offer under paragraph (i) of this subsection states that it must be accepted by the purchaser, seller, or recipient of investment advice within thirty (30) days after the date of its receipt by the purchaser, seller, or recipient of investment advice or any shorter period, of not less than three (3) days, that the secretary of state, by order, specifies;

The offeror has the present ability to pay the amount offered or to tender the security under paragraph (i) of this subsection;

The offer under paragraph (i) of this subsection is delivered to the purchaser, seller, or recipient of investment advice, or sent in a manner that ensures receipt by the purchaser, seller, or recipient of investment advice; and

The purchaser, seller, or recipient of investment advice that accepts the offer under paragraph (i) of this subsection in a record within the period specified under paragraph (ii) of this subsection is paid in accordance with the terms of the offer.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.